Massachusetts, session 194th, S2448.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 89 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 32 the word “thirty-five” and replacing
it with the following: “two hundred.”
SECTION 2. Section 8 of chapter 89 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding at the end thereof, the following new paragraph:
Any person who is found guilty of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of
the provisions of this section shall be subject to the following penalties:
(a) If the violation results in the injury of another person, the offender shall, in addition to
any other penalties, be fined two hundred dollars and have their driver's or commercial driver's
of 2

license or permit or nonresident operating privilege suspended for a period of not less than thirty
days, or both.
(b) If the violation results in the serious bodily injury of another person, the offender
shall, in addition to any other penalties, be fined five hundred dollars and have their driver's or
commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege suspended for a period
of not less than ninety days, or both.
(c) If the violation results in the death of another person, the offender shall, in addition to
any other penalties, be fined one thousand dollars and have their driver's or commercial driver's
license or permit or nonresident operating privilege suspended for a period of not less than one
hundred eighty days, or both.
(d) For purposes of this section, "serious bodily injury" shall mean a bodily injury which
involves unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, or protracted and obvious disfigurement,
protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty, or a
substantial risk of death.
of 2